Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.260

Duty of department of commerce to assist newly incorporated cities and towns.

The department of commerce shall identify federal, state, and local agencies that should receive notification that a new city or town is about to incorporate and shall assist newly formed cities and towns during the interim period before the official date of incorporation in providing such notification to the identified agencies.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2014; 1995 c 399 s 34; 1991 c 360 s 6.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.